Wyoming, session 2025, HB0301.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-2-117(a), (b) and by creating a
new subsection (e) and 28-2-118(a), (b) and by creating a
new subsection (d) are amended to read:

28-2-117. Effective date of changes in legislative
districts; election of holdover senators.

(a) Subject to subsection (e) of this section,
changes in all legislative districts are effective for the
HB0301

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0612
2022 general election cycle and the sixty-seventh
legislature.

(b) Subject to subsection (e) of this section,
members for senate districts designated as odd-numbered
districts in W.S. 28-2-118(b) shall be elected for a term
of four (4) years at the 2022 general election. As provided
in subsection (c) of this section, no election shall be
held in 2022 for senate districts designated as
even-numbered districts in W.S. 28-2-118(b) for which
members were elected at the 2020 general election and
nothing in this act shall affect the terms of those
members. Members for senate districts designated as
even-numbered districts in W.S. 28-2-118(b), shall be
elected for a term of four (4) years at the 2024 general
election.

(e) Changes to senate districts as provided in W.S.
28-2-118(d) are effective for the 2028 general election
cycle and the seventieth legislature. All senate districts
shall be elected in the 2028 general election and no member
elected at the 2026 general election or earlier, or
appointed during the sixty-ninth legislature, shall
HB0301

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0612
continue in office regardless of the term for which the
member was elected or appointed. Members for senate
districts designated as odd-numbered districts in W.S.
28-2-118(d) shall be elected for a term of two (2) years at
the 2028 general election. Members for senate districts
designated as even-numbered districts in W.S. 28-2-118(d)
shall be elected for a term of four (4) years at the 2028
general election. For the 2030 general election and
thereafter, members for any senate district standing for
election shall be elected for a four (4) year term.

28-2-118. Senate legislative districts; list of
nested house districts formed to create senate districts.

(a) Subsection (b) Subsections (b) and (d) of this
section creates create legislative districts for the
Wyoming senate consisting of the numbered legislative
districts contained therein. There shall be one (1)
senator elected from each legislative district as specified
in subsection (b) or (d) of this section. If the senate
district is listed with two (2) house districts in
subsection (b) of this section, those senate districts
shall consist of the entirety of the geographic area of the
HB0301

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0612
two (2) house districts listed in subsection (b) of this
section for each senate district and as fully described in
"Attachment A." All senate districts are fully described in
"Attachment B."

(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this
section, senate districts shall be organized as follows:

(d) Effective for the 2028 general election for the
seventieth legislature and thereafter, senate districts
shall be organized as provided in this subsection. Each
numbered legislative district in this subsection consists
of the combined geographic area within the entire specified
county:

(i) Senate district 1 – Natrona county;

(ii) Senate district 2 – Laramie county;

(iii) Senate district 3 – Sheridan county;

(iv) Senate district 4 – Sweetwater county;

HB0301

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0612
(v) Senate district 5 – Albany county;

(vi) Senate district 6 – Carbon county;

(vii) Senate district 7 – Goshen county;

(viii) Senate district 8 – Platte county;

(ix) Senate district 9 – Big Horn county;

(x) Senate district 10 – Fremont county;

(xi) Senate district 11 – Park county;

(xii) Senate district 12 – Lincoln county;

(xiii) Senate district 13 – Converse county;

(xiv) Senate district 14 – Niobrara county;

(xv) Senate district 15 – Hot springs county;

(xvi) Senate district 16 – Johnson county;
HB0301

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0612

(xvii) Senate district 17 – Campbell county;

(xviii) Senate district 18 – Crook county;

(xix) Senate district 19 – Uinta county;

(xx) Senate district 20 – Washakie county;

(xxi) Senate district 21 – Weston county;

(xxii) Senate district 22 – Teton county; and

(xxiii) Senate district 23 – Sublette county.

Section 2. The joint corporations, elections and
political subdivisions interim committee shall review the
changes implemented by this act and shall recommend any
additional statutory changes to management council not
later than October 1, 2026.

HB0301

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0612
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0301